Massachusetts, session 194th, H129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The department of transitional assistance and the department of agricultural 
resources shall jointly select a state-wide organization, which engages with both SNAP 
recipients and Massachusetts farmers, to conduct a survey regarding the healthy incentives 
program for the purpose of ensuring that said program is best meeting the needs of both 
consumers and farmers, and to inform future outreach efforts about the program. The survey 
shall be distributed to both participants and non participants of the program.  
The survey shall collect information about the healthy incentives program from 
Massachusetts farmers and SNAP recipients, including, but not limited to:  

of 2 9  (i) The knowledge that both participants and non participants have about the healthy 
incentives program including, but not limited to, the purpose and benefits of the program, and 
where and how the benefits of the program can be utilized;  
(ii) the frequency with which participants utilize the program;  
(iii) how and where participants learned about the program;  
(iv) any barriers that both participants and non participants experience when trying to 
utilize the program;  
(v) and feedback from both participants and non participants regarding their experiences 
with the program.  
SECTION 2. The commissioners of the Massachusetts department of transitional 
assistance and the department of agricultural resources shall establish rules and procedures, 
including deadlines for dissemination and collection of survey information, consistent with the 
purposes of this act, and shall promote the effective solicitation to achieve the highest practical 
response rate, collection, and publication of information gathered from the commonwealth’s 
farmers and SNAP recipients regarding their experiences with and knowledge of the healthy 
incentive’s program. The commissioners shall ensure that the survey is conducted no later than 
12 months within the passage of this act. The commissioners shall also ensure that the results of 
the survey are published on their department’s websites, and submitted to the clerks of the house 
and senate within 12 months of the passage of this act.